Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1560.03
Litter fee; payment; nonduplication.

Any person engaged in business as both a manufacturer and a retailer or as both a wholesaler and a retailer shall pay the fee either under section 81-1559 or 81-1560.01, whichever is greater. No person shall be required to pay a fee more than once on the same item or product under the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act.

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 15.
December 1, 2020